District of Columbia statutes.
47-502

Account showing receipts and disbursements of revenues and expenditures.

The Treasury Department shall accurately keep an account showing all receipts and disbursements relative to the revenues and expenditures of the District of Columbia, and shall also show the sources of the revenue, the purpose of expenditure, and the appropriation under which the expenditure is made; and any and all revenue derived from property not owned wholly or in part by the District of Columbia, as between the United States and the District of Columbia, shall be the property of the United States.

History

June 29, 1922, 42 Stat. 669, ch. 249
Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 693, ch. 690, title X, § 1
May 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 375, ch. 223, § 8
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-502.
1973 Ed., § 47-502.